Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,231
Claim under act; insurance coverage; effect.

Whenever a claim or suit under the State Tort Claims Act is covered by liability insurance or by group self-insurance provided by a risk management pool, the provisions of the liability insurance policy on defense and settlement of claims or the provisions of the agreement forming the risk management pool and related documents providing for defense and settlement of claims covered under such group self-insurance shall be applicable notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of the act. The Attorney General and the State Claims Board shall cooperate with the insurance company or risk management pool.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 23, p. 2852;

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 48;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 42;

Laws 1989, LB 541, § 7.

Risk management pool, defined, see section 44-4303.